Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE D. IRRIGATION DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7503. DELTA LAKE IRRIGATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7503.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Delta Lake Irrigation District.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.08, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 7503.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Willacy and Hidalgo Counties, Texas, created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.08, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 7503.003. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds that the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.08, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 7503.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 1, Chapter 166, Acts of the 41st Legislature, Regular Session, 1929, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Chapter 25, General Laws, Acts of the 39th Legislature, Regular Session, 1925 (Article 7880-1 et seq., Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), before August 30, 1971;

(2) Chapter 3, General Laws, Acts of the 46th Legislature, Regular Session, 1939 (Article 7775c-1, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), before August 30, 1971;

(3) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code, before June 19, 1980;

(4) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code;

(5) Subchapter N, Chapter 58, Water Code; or

(6) other law.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.08, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS

Sec. 7503.051. GENERAL POWERS. The district has:

(1) the powers of a conservation and reclamation district under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and the general laws of this state; and

(2) the powers of government and the authority to exercise the rights, privileges, and functions that are conferred by this chapter and the general laws of this state.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.08, eff. April 1, 2009.